Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.100

Subpoenas—Witnesses and fees.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and/or the production of books, documents and records, anywhere in the state in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a license issued under the provisions of this chapter. Witnesses shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel, as provided for in chapter 2.40 RCW, as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 1961 c 29 s 10.]